North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-104.6.
Effective date of conversion — Effect.

A conversion is effective when the filing requirements of subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-104.4 have been fulfilled or on a later date specified in the articles of conversion.

With respect to the effect of conversion on the converting organization and on the converted organization:

An organization that has been converted as provided in sections 10-19.1-104.1 through 10-19.1-104.6 is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

Upon a conversion becoming effective:

If the converted organization:

Is a corporation, then the converted organization has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers, and is subject to all the duties and liabilities, of a corporation incorporated under this chapter; or

Is not a corporation, then the converted organization has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers, and is subject to the duties and liabilities as provided in its governing statute;

All property owned by the converting organization remains vested in the converted organization;

All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the converting organization continue as obligations of the converted organization;

An action or proceeding pending by or against the converting organization may be continued as if the conversion has not occurred;

Except as otherwise provided by other law, all rights, privileges, immunities, and powers of the converting organization remain vested in the converted organization; and

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect.

When a conversion becomes effective, each ownership interest in the converting organization is deemed to be converted into ownership interests in the converted organization or, in whole or in part, into money or other property to be received under the plan, subject to any dissenters’ rights under section 10-19.1-87.

A converted organization that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any obligation owed by the converting corporation, if before the conversion the converting corporation was subject to suit in this state on the obligation.

A converted organization that is a foreign organization and not authorized to transact business in this state appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for purposes of enforcing an obligation under this subsection as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 33; 2007, ch. 99, § 16.

10-19.1-105.
Methods of dissolution.

A corporation may be dissolved:

Before the issuance of shares, pursuant to section 10-19.1-106;

After the issuance of shares, pursuant to sections 10-19.1-107 through 10-19.1-113.1; or

By order of a court pursuant to sections 10-19.1-114 through 10-19.1-122.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 54, § 3; 2009, ch. 106, § 18.

10-19.1-106.
Voluntary dissolution prior to the issuance of shares.

A corporation that has not issued shares may be dissolved by the incorporators or directors in the manner set forth in this section:

A majority of the incorporators or directors shall sign articles of dissolution containing:

The name of the corporation;

The date of incorporation;

A statement that shares have not been issued;

A statement that all consideration received from subscribers for shares to be issued, less expenses incurred in the organization of the corporation, has been returned to the subscribers; and

A statement that no debts remain unpaid.

The articles of dissolution must be filed with the secretary of state, with the fees provided for in section 10-19.1-147.

When the articles of dissolution have been filed with the secretary of state, the corporation is dissolved.

The secretary of state shall issue to the dissolved corporation or its legal representative a certificate of dissolution that contains:

The name of the corporation;

The date the articles of dissolution were filed with the secretary of state; and

A statement that the corporation is dissolved.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 17; 1995, ch. 103, § 40; 1999, ch. 50, § 18; 1999, ch. 95, § 35.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-01.

10-19.1-107.
Voluntary dissolution after the issuance of shares.

After the issuance of shares, a corporation may be dissolved when authorized in the manner set forth in this section:

If the corporation has outstanding shares, then:

Written notice must be given to each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote at a meeting of shareholders within the time and in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-73 for notice of meetings of shareholders and, whether the meeting is a regular or a special meeting, must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

The proposed dissolution must be submitted for approval at a meeting of shareholders. If the proposed dissolution is approved at a meeting by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote, the dissolution must be commenced.

If the corporation no longer has any outstanding shares, then the directors may authorize and commence the dissolution. If the directors take that action, then:

The notice of dissolution filed under section 10-19.1-108 shall so reflect; and

The directors shall have the right to revoke the dissolution proceedings in accordance with section 10-19.1-112.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 2009, ch. 106, § 19.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-02, 10-21-03.

Cross-References.

Dissolution of banks and trust companies, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-07.

Dissolution of insurance companies, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-07.

10-19.1-108.
Filing notice of intent to dissolve — Effect.

If dissolution of the corporation is approved pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of section 10-19.1-107, the corporation shall file with the secretary of state, with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147, a notice of intent to dissolve. The notice must contain:

The name of the corporation;

The date and place of the meeting at which the resolution was approved pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of section 10-19.1-107; and

A statement that the requisite vote of the shareholders was received or that all shareholders entitled to vote signed a written action.

When the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, and subject to section 10-19.1-112, the corporation shall cease to carry on its business, except to the extent necessary for the winding up of the corporation. The shareholders shall retain the right to revoke the dissolution proceedings in accordance with section 10-19.1-112 and the right to remove directors or fill vacancies on the board. The corporate existence continues to the extent necessary to wind up the affairs of the corporation until the dissolution proceedings are revoked or articles of dissolution are filed with the secretary of state.

The filing with the secretary of state of a notice of intent to dissolve does not affect any remedy in favor of the corporation or any remedy against it or its directors, officers, or shareholders in those capacities, except as provided in sections 10-19.1-110, 10-19.1-110.1, and 10-19.1-124.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 18; 1993, ch. 54, § 45; 1999, ch. 50, § 19; 1999, ch. 95, § 36.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-03, 10-21-04, 10-21-05.

Cross-References.

Notice of shareholders’ meetings, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-73.

Collateral References.

Preferred stockholders’ rights, upon liquidation or dissolution, to dividends, 25 A.L.R.2d 788.

Patent, copyright, or trade-mark owned by corporation on dissolution thereof, stockholder’s rights to, 30 A.L.R.2d 938.

Criminal proceedings, maintainability against dissolved corporation, 40 A.L.R.2d 1396.

Arbitration proceedings, dissolved corporation’s power to participate in, 71 A.L.R.2d 1121.

Service of process upon dissolved domestic corporation in absence of express statutory direction, 75 A.L.R.2d 1399.

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension, 83 A.L.R.3d 458.

10-19.1-109.
Procedure in dissolution.

When a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the board, or the officers acting under the direction of the board, shall proceed as soon as possible:

To collect or make provisions for the collection of all known debts due or owing to the corporation, including unpaid subscriptions for shares;

Except as provided in sections 10-19.1-110, 10-19.1-110.1, and 10-19.1-124, to pay or make provision for the payment of all known debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation according to their priorities; and

To give notice to creditors and claimants under section 10-19.1-110 or to proceed under section 10-19.1-110.1.

Notwithstanding section 10-19.1-104, when a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the directors may sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property and assets of a dissolving corporation without a vote of the shareholders.

All tangible or intangible property, including money, remaining after the discharge of, or after making adequate provision for the discharge of, the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation must be distributed to the shareholders in accordance with subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-92.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 46; 1995, ch. 103, § 41.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-06.

10-19.1-110.
Dissolution procedure for corporations that give notice to creditors and claimants.

When a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the corporation may give notice of the filing to each creditor of and claimant against the corporation known or unknown, present or future, and contingent or noncontingent.

If notice to creditors and claimants is given, it must be given by:

Publishing the notice once each week for four successive weeks in an official newspaper, as defined in chapter 46-06, in the county or counties where the registered office and the principal executive office of the corporation are located; and

Giving written notice to known creditors and claimants pursuant to subsection 39 of section 10-19.1-01.

The notice to creditors and claimants must contain:

A statement that the corporation is in the process of dissolving;

A statement that the corporation has filed with the secretary of state a notice of intent to dissolve;

The date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve;

The address of the office to which written claims against the corporation must be presented; and

The date by which all the claims must be received, which must be the later of ninety days after published notice or, with respect to a particular known creditor or claimant, ninety days after the date on which written notice was given to that creditor or claimant. Published notice is deemed given on the date of first publication for the purpose of determining this date.

With respect to claims against a corporation that gave notice to creditors and claimants:

The corporation has thirty days from the receipt of each claim filed according to the procedures set forth by the corporation on or before the date set forth in the notice to accept or reject the claim by giving written notice to the person submitting it. A claim not expressly rejected in this manner is deemed accepted.

A creditor or claimant to whom notice is given and whose claim is rejected by the corporation has:

Sixty days from the date of rejection;

One hundred eighty days from the date the corporation filed with the secretary of state the notice of intent to dissolve; or

Ninety days after the date on which notice was given to the creditor or claimant,

A creditor or claimant to whom notice is given who fails to file a claim according to the procedures set forth by the corporation on or before the date set forth in the notice is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon it or enforcing it, except as provided in section 10-19.1-124.

A creditor or claimant whose claim is rejected by the corporation under subdivision b is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, if the creditor or claimant does not initiate legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings with respect to the claim within the time provided in subdivision b.

Articles of dissolution for a corporation dissolving under this section that has given notice to creditors and claimants under this section must be filed with the secretary of state after:

The ninety-day period in subdivision e of subsection 2 has expired and the payment of claims of all creditors and claimants filing a claim within that period has been made or provided for; or

The longest of the periods described in subdivision b of subsection 3 has expired and there are no pending legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings by or against the corporation commenced within the time provided in subdivision b of subsection 3.

The articles of dissolution for a corporation that has given notice to creditors and claimants under this section must state:

The last date on which the notice was given and:

That the payment of all creditors and claimants filing a claim within the ninety-day period in subdivision e of subsection 2 has been made or provided for; or

The date on which the longest of the periods described in subdivision b of subsection 3 expired;

That the remaining property, assets, and claims of the corporation have been distributed among its shareholders in accordance with subsection 5 of section 10-19.1-92, or that adequate provision has been made for that distribution; and

That there are no pending legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings by or against the corporation commenced within the time provided in subdivision b of subsection 3, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree that may be entered against it in a pending proceeding.

whichever is longer, to pursue any other remedies with respect to the claim.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 47; 1995, ch. 103, § 42; 1997, ch. 103, § 57; 2003, ch. 85, § 18; 2005, ch. 100, § 34; 2007, ch. 101, § 34; 2019, ch. 94, § 15, effective August 1, 2019.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-06.

10-19.1-110.1.
Dissolution procedure for corporations that do not give notice to creditors and claimants.

When a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and the corporation has elected not to give notice to creditors and claimants in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-110:

Articles of dissolution for a corporation that has not given notice to creditors and claimants in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-110:

Must be filed with the secretary of state after:

The payment of claims of all known creditors and claimants has been made or provided for; or

At least two years have elapsed from the date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve; and

Must state:

If the articles of dissolution are being filed pursuant to paragraph 1 of subdivision a, that all known debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made for payment or discharge;

That the remaining property, assets, and claims of the corporation have been distributed among its shareholders in accordance with subsection 5 of section 10-19.1-92, or that adequate provision has been made for that distribution; and

That there are no pending legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings by or against the corporation, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree that may be entered against it in a pending proceeding.

With respect to claims against a corporation that does not give notice:

If a corporation has paid or provided for all known creditors or claimants at the time articles of dissolution are filed, a creditor or claimant who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy, in a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding within two years after the date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it.

If the corporation has not paid or provided for all known creditors and claimants at the time articles of dissolution are filed, a person who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy in a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding within two years after the date of filing the notice of intent to dissolve is barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, except as provided in section 10-19.1-124.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 48; 1997, ch. 103, § 58; 1999, ch. 50, § 20.

10-19.1-111.
Claims in dissolution. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 107.

10-19.1-112.
Revocation of dissolution proceedings.

Dissolution proceedings commenced pursuant to section 10-19.1-107 may be revoked prior to filing of articles of dissolution.

Written notice must be given to every shareholder entitled to vote at a shareholders’ meeting within the time and in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-73 for notice of meetings of shareholders and must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the advisability of revoking the dissolution proceedings. The proposed revocation must be submitted to the shareholders at the meeting. If the proposed revocation is approved at a meeting by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote, the dissolution proceedings are revoked.

Revocation of dissolution proceedings is effective when a notice of revocation is filed with the secretary of state, with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147. The corporation may resume business after this revocation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 19; 1999, ch. 50, § 21; 1999, ch. 95, § 37.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-07, 10-21-08, 10-21-09, 10-21-10.

Cross-References.

Notice of shareholders’ meetings, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-73.

10-19.1-113.
Articles of dissolution — Certificate of dissolution — Effect. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 107.

10-19.1-113.1.
Filing of articles of dissolution — Effective date of dissolution — Certificate.

An original of the articles of dissolution must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state determines the articles of dissolution conform to law and all fees have been paid under section 10-19.1-147, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of dissolution.

When the certificate of dissolution has been issued by the secretary of state, or on a later date within thirty days after filing if the articles of dissolution so provide, the corporation is dissolved.

The secretary of state shall issue to the corporation, or its legal representative, a certificate of dissolution that contains:

The name of the corporation;

The date the dissolution is effective; and

A statement that the corporation was dissolved on the effective date of the dissolution.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 49; 1999, ch. 50, § 22; 1999, ch. 95, § 38; 2003, ch. 85, § 19.

10-19.1-114.
Supervised voluntary dissolution.

After the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and before a certificate of dissolution has been issued, the corporation, or for good cause shown, a shareholder or creditor may apply to a court within the county in which the principal executed office or the registered office of the corporation is situated to have the dissolution conducted or continued under the supervision of the court as provided in sections 10-19.1-115 through 10-19.1-124.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-16.

10-19.1-115.
Involuntary dissolution.

This section applies to corporations that are not publicly held corporations.

A court may grant any equitable relief it deems just and reasonable in the circumstances or may dissolve a corporation and liquidate its assets and business:

In a supervised voluntary dissolution pursuant to section 10-19.1-114;

In an action by a shareholder when it is established that:

The directors or the persons having the authority otherwise vested in the board are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and the corporation or the parties have not provided for a procedure to resolve the dispute;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted fraudulently or illegally toward one or more shareholders in their capacities as shareholders or directors of any corporation or as officers or employees of a closely held corporation;

The directors or those in control of the corporation have acted in a manner unfairly prejudicial toward one or more shareholders in their capacities as shareholders or directors of a corporation that is not a publicly held corporation or as officers or employees of a closely held corporation;

The shareholders of the corporation are so divided in voting power that, for a period that includes the time when two consecutive regular meetings were held, they have failed to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election and qualification of their successors;

The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The period of duration as provided in the articles has expired and has not been extended as provided in section 10-19.1-127;

In an action by a creditor when:

The claim of the creditor has been reduced to judgment and an execution thereon has been returned unsatisfied; or

The corporation has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor is due and owing and it is established that the corporation is unable to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business; or

In an action by the attorney general to dissolve the corporation in accordance with section 10-19.1-118 when it is established that a decree of dissolution is appropriate.

In determining whether to order equitable relief or dissolution, the court shall take into consideration the financial condition of the corporation but may not refuse to order equitable relief or dissolution solely on the ground that the corporation has accumulated or current operating profits.

In an action under subdivision b of subsection 2 involving a corporation that is not a publicly held corporation at the time the action is commenced and in which one or more of the circumstances described in that subdivision is established, the court, upon motion of a corporation or a shareholder or beneficial owner of shares of the corporation, may order the sale by a plaintiff or a defendant of all shares of the corporation held by the plaintiff or defendant to either the corporation or the moving shareholders, whichever is specified in the motion, if the court determines in its discretion that an order would be fair and equitable to all parties under the circumstances of the case.

The purchase price of any shares so sold must be the fair value of the shares as of the date of the commencement of the action or as of another date found equitable by the court. However, if the shares in question are then subject to sale and purchase pursuant to the bylaws of the corporation, a shareholder control agreement, the terms of the shares, or otherwise, the court shall order the sale for the price and on the terms as set forth, unless the court determines that the price or terms are unreasonable under all the circumstances of the case.

Within five days after the entry of the order, the corporation shall provide each selling shareholder or beneficial owner with the information it is required to provide under subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-88.

If the parties are unable to agree on fair value within forty days of entry of the order, the court shall determine the fair value of the shares under the provisions of subsection 10 of section 10-19.1-88 and may allow interest or costs as provided in subsections 1 and 11 of section 10-19.1-88.

The purchase price must be paid in one or more installments as agreed on by the parties, or, if no agreement can be reached within forty days of entry of the order, as ordered by the court. Upon entry of an order for the sale of shares under this subsection and provided that the corporation or the moving shareholders post a bond in adequate amount with sufficient sureties or otherwise satisfy the court that the full purchase price of the shares, plus any additional costs, expenses, and fees as may be awarded, will be paid when due and payable, the selling shareholders shall no longer have any rights or status as shareholders, officers, or directors, except the right to receive the fair value of their shares plus such other amounts as may be awarded.

In determining whether to order equitable relief or dissolution, the court shall take into consideration the duty which all shareholders in a closely held corporation owe one another to act in an honest, fair, and reasonable manner in the operation of the corporation and the reasonable expectations of the shareholders as they exist at the inception and develop during the course of the shareholders’ relationship with the corporation and with each other. For purposes of this section, any written agreement, including an employment agreement and a buy-sell agreement, between or among shareholders or between or among one or more shareholders and the corporation is presumed to reflect the parties’ reasonable expectation concerning the matters dealt with in the agreement.

In deciding whether to order dissolution, the court shall consider whether lesser relief suggested by one or more parties, such as any form of equitable relief, a buyout, or a partial liquidation, would be adequate to permanently relieve the circumstances established under subdivision b or c of subsection 1. Lesser relief may be ordered in any case when it would be appropriate under all the facts and circumstances of the case.

If the court finds that a party to a proceeding brought under this section has acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or otherwise not in good faith, it may in its discretion award reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, to any of the other parties.

Proceedings under this section must be brought in a court within the county in which the principal executive office of the corporation is located. It is not necessary to make shareholders parties to the action or proceeding unless relief is sought against them personally.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 50; 1995, ch. 103, § 43; 1997, ch. 103, § 59; 2013, ch. 89, § 7; 2021, ch. 56, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-16.

Cross-References.

Failure to file an annual report, involuntary dissolution for, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-146.

10-19.1-116.
Procedure in involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution.

In dissolution proceedings the court may issue injunctions, appoint receivers with all powers and duties the court directs, take other actions required to preserve the corporate assets wherever situated, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

After a full hearing has been held, upon whatever notice the court directs to be given to all parties to the proceedings and to any other parties in interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a receiver to collect the corporate assets, including all amounts owing to the corporation by subscribers on account of any unpaid portion to the corporation by subscribers on account of any unpaid portion of the consideration for the issuance of shares. A receiver has authority, subject to the order of the court, to continue the business of the corporation and to sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or any of the property and assets of the corporation either at public or private sale.

The assets of the corporation or the proceeds resulting from a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition must be applied in the following order of priority to the payment and discharge of:

The costs and expenses of the proceedings, including attorney’s fees and disbursements;

Debts, taxes, and assessments due the United States, this state and its subdivisions, and other states and their subdivisions, in that order;

Claims duly proved and allowed to employees under title 65. Claims under this subdivision may not be allowed if the corporation carried workforce safety and insurance, as provided by law, at the time the injury was sustained;

Claims, including the value of all compensation paid in any medium other than money, duly proved and allowed to employees for services performed within three months preceding the appointment of the receiver, if any; and

Other claims duly proved and allowed.

After payment of the expenses of receivership and claims of creditors duly proved, the remaining assets, if any, must be distributed to the shareholders in accordance with subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-92.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1989, ch. 69, § 3; 1995, ch. 54, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-17.

10-19.1-117.
Qualifications of receivers — Powers.

A receiver must be an individual, a domestic organization, or a foreign organization authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state. A receiver shall give bond as directed by the court with the sureties required by the court.

A receiver may sue and defend in all courts as receiver of the corporation. The court appointing the receiver has exclusive jurisdiction of the corporation and its property.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 60.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-18.

Cross-References.

Receivers, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-10.

10-19.1-118.
Action by attorney general.

A corporation may be dissolved involuntarily by a decree of a court in this state in an action filed by the attorney general when it is established that:

The articles and certificate of incorporation were procured through fraud;

The corporation was incorporated for a purpose not permitted by section 10-19.1-08;

The corporation failed to comply with the requirements of sections 10-19.1-02 through 10-19.1-24 essential to incorporation under or election to become governed by this chapter;

The corporation has failed for thirty days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state as provided in chapter 10-01.1;

The corporation has failed for thirty days after change of its registered office or registered agent to file in the office of the secretary of state a statement of such change as provided in chapter 10-01.1; or

The corporation has acted, or failed to act, in a manner that constitutes surrender or abandonment of the corporate franchise, privileges, or enterprise.

An action may not be commenced under this section until thirty days after notice to the corporation by the attorney general of the reason for the filing of the action. If the reason for filing the action is an act that the corporation has done, or omitted to do, and the act or omission may be corrected by an amendment of the articles or bylaws or by performance of or abstention from the act, the attorney general shall give the corporation thirty additional days in which to effect the correction before filing the action.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 2007, ch. 99, § 17.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-13.

Cross-References.

Charter of corporation may be vacated for unfair discrimination in sale of farm products, see N.D.C.C. § 4-14-05.

10-19.1-119.
Filing claims in proceedings to dissolve.

In proceedings referred to in section 10-19.1-115 to dissolve a corporation, the court may require all creditors and claimants of the corporation to file their claims under oath with the clerk of court or with the receiver in a form prescribed by the court.

If the court requires the filing of claims, it shall fix a date, which may not be less than one hundred twenty days from the date of the order, as the last day for the filing of claims, and shall prescribe the notice of the fixed date that must be given to creditors and claimants. Before the fixed date, the court may extend the time for filing claims. Creditors and claimants failing to file claims on or before the fixed date may be barred, by order of court, from claiming an interest in or receiving payment out of the property or assets of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-19.

10-19.1-120.
Discontinuance of dissolution proceedings.

The involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution of a corporation must be discontinued at any time during the dissolution proceedings when it is established that cause for dissolution no longer exists. When this is established, the court shall dismiss the proceedings and direct the receiver, if any, to redeliver to the corporation all its remaining property and assets.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-20.

10-19.1-121.
Decree of dissolution.

In an involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution after the costs and expenses of the proceedings and all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation have been paid or discharged and all of its remaining property and assets have been distributed to its shareholders or, if its property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy and discharge the costs, expenses, debts, obligations, and liabilities, when all the property and assets have been applied so far as they will go to their payment according to the priorities set forth in section 10-19.1-116, the court shall enter a decree dissolving the corporation.

When the decree dissolving the corporation has been entered, the corporation is dissolved.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-21.

10-19.1-122.
Filing decree.

After the court enters a decree dissolving a corporation, the clerk of court shall cause a certified copy of the decree to be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state may not charge a fee for filing the decree.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-22.

10-19.1-123.
Deposit with administrator of abandoned property of amount due certain shareholders — Appropriation.

Upon dissolution of a corporation, the portion of the assets distributable to a person who is unknown or cannot be found must be reduced to money and deposited with the administrator of abandoned property for disposition pursuant to chapter 47-30.2. The amount deposited is appropriated to the administrator of abandoned property and must be paid over to the person or a legal representative, upon proof satisfactory to the administrator of abandoned property of a right to payment.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1987, ch. 73, § 4; 1997, ch. 103, § 61; 2021, ch. 337, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-23.

10-19.1-124.
Claims barred — Exceptions.

A person who is or becomes a creditor or claimant at any time before, during, or following the conclusion of dissolution proceedings, who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy in a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding within the time provided in section 10-19.1-110, 10-19.1-110.1, 10-19.1-114, 10-19.1-115, or 10-19.1-119, or has not begun a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding before the beginning of the dissolution proceedings, and a person claiming through or under the creditor or claimant, is barred from bringing that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, except as provided in this section.

At any time within one year after articles of dissolution have been filed with the secretary of state, or a decree of dissolution has been entered, a creditor or claimant who shows good cause for not having previously filed the claim may apply to a court in this state to allow a claim:

Against the corporation to the extent of undistributed assets; or

If the undistributed assets are not sufficient to satisfy the claim, against a shareholder, whose liability is limited to a portion of the claim that is equal to the portion of the distributions to shareholders in liquidation or dissolution received by the shareholder, but in no event may a shareholder’s liability exceed the amount which that shareholder actually received in the dissolution.

All known contractual debts, obligations, and liabilities incurred in the course of winding up the corporation’s affairs shall be paid by the corporation before the distribution of assets to a shareholder. A person to whom this kind of debt, obligation, or liability is owed but not paid may pursue any remedy against the officers and directors of the corporation who are responsible for, but who fail to cause the corporation to pay or make provision for, payment of the debts, obligations, and liabilities, or against shareholders to the extent permitted under section 10-19.1-94. This subsection does not apply to dissolution under the supervision or order of a court.

Any statutory and common-law rights of persons who may bring claims of injury to a person, including death, are not affected by dissolution under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 51; 1997, ch. 103, § 62; 2009, ch. 106, § 20.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-24.

10-19.1-125.
Right to sue or defend after dissolution.

After a corporation has been dissolved, any of its former officers, directors, or shareholders may assert or defend, in the name of the corporation, any claim by or against the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-21-24.

Collateral References.

Liability of shareholders, directors, and officers where corporate business is continued after its dissolution, 72 A.L.R.4th 419.

10-19.1-126.
Omitted assets.

Title to assets remaining after payment of all debts, obligations, or liabilities and after distributions to shareholders may be transferred by a court in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

10-19.1-127.
Extension after duration expired.

A corporation whose period of duration as provided in the articles has expired and which has continued to do business despite that expiration may reinstate its articles and extend the period of duration, including making the duration perpetual, within one year after the date of expiration by filing an amendment to the articles as set forth in this section.

An amendment to the articles must be approved by the board and must include:

The date on which the period of duration expired under the articles;

A statement that the period of duration will be perpetual or, if some shorter period is to be provided, the date to which the period of duration is extended; and

A statement that the corporation has been in continuous operation since before the date of expiration of its original period of duration.

The amendment to the articles must be presented, after notice, at a meeting of the shareholders. The amendment is adopted when approved by the shareholders pursuant to section 10-19.1-19.

Articles of amendment, together with any fees and delinquent filings and reports, conforming to section 10-19.1-21 must be filed with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 63.